Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
ARTICLE 19
DEBT-MANAGEMENT SERVICES

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2017. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

PART 1 COLORADO CREDIT SERVICES ORGANIZATION ACT

PART 2 UNIFORM DEBT-MANAGEMENT SERVICES ACT